Hawaii statutes.
§49-19 Bond anticipation notes. In
anticipation of the issuance under this chapter of revenue bonds theretofore
authorized by the governing body for an undertaking or a loan program and of
the receipt of the proceeds of the bonds, the county, with the approval of the
governing body, may issue and sell revenue bond anticipation notes for the
purposes for which the revenue bonds have been authorized, the maximum
principal amount of which notes shall not exceed the authorized principal
amount of the revenue bonds. The notes shall be payable solely from and
secured by the proceeds of the sale of the revenue bonds in anticipation of
which they were issued and the revenue, or the user taxes, or a combination of
both, from which would be payable and by which would be secured those revenue
bonds; provided that to the extent the principal of the notes is paid from
moneys other than the proceeds of sale of the revenue bonds, the maximum amount
of revenue bonds in anticipation of which the notes are issued that has been
authorized shall be reduced by the amount of the notes paid in that manner.
The issuance of the notes and the details thereof shall be governed by this
chapter with respect to revenue bonds insofar as the same may apply, provided
that each note, together with all renewals and extensions thereof or refundings
thereof by other notes issued under this section, shall mature within five
years from the date of the original note. [L 1989, c 80, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next